Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 2

Jurors

20-9-201. Calling names of jurors.

In all civil causes, before the jury is sworn, the clerk shall call over the names of the jury in the panel, in the presence and hearing of the parties and their counsel.

Code 1858, § 2961 (deriv. Acts 1803, ch. 2, § 5); Shan., § 4686; Code 1932, § 8813; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1307.

Cross-References. Challenge of jurors, §§22-3-102 —22-3-105.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 25.42.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jury, § 36.

20-9-202. Delays in trial — Other business.

Pending the trial of any cause in any court at intervals in which jurors are being summoned, or the progress of the trial is otherwise delayed, the court may proceed with the other business of the court, but so as not to delay the cause on trial.

Acts 1870, ch. 20, § 1; Shan., § 4685; Code 1932, § 8812; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1308.

Collateral References. 88 C.J.S. Trial § 45.

Absence of judge from courtroom during trial of civil case. 25 A.L.R.3d 637.

Trial
26.

20-9-203. Disability of juror.

If, after the jury is impaneled, and before verdict, a juror becomes sick or otherwise disabled so as to be unable to perform jury duty, the juror may be discharged by the court. In such case, unless otherwise arranged by the parties, the vacancy may be filled and the trial commenced anew, or the court may, in its discretion, order the jury to be discharged and a new one impaneled.

In case of the disability of a juror or jurors, under this section, the cause may be tried and determined, by consent of parties, by the remaining jurors.

Code 1858, §§ 2962, 2963 (deriv. Acts 1817, ch. 99, § 1); Shan., §§ 4687, 4688; Code 1932, §§ 8814, 8815; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 20-1309.

Cross-References. Alternate jurors, Tenn. R. Civ. P. 47.02.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 10 Tenn. Juris., Double Jeopardy, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Criminal Law and Procedure (William D. Warren), 6 Vand. L. Rev. 1179.